Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.040

Visual and auditory screening of pupils—Access to rules, records, and forms.

The superintendent of public instruction shall provide access to appropriate school officials the rules adopted by the state board of health pursuant to RCW 28A.210.020 and the recommended records and forms to be used in making and reporting such screenings. Providing online access to the materials satisfies the requirements of this section.

[ 2009 c 556 s 4; 1990 c 33 s 189; 1973 c 46 s 1. Prior: 1971 c 48 s 12; 1971 c 32 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.31.050; prior: 1941 c 202 s 3; RRS s 4689-3. Formerly RCW 28A.31.050, 28.31.050.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 c 46: "If any provision of this 1973 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 c 46 s 5.]

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.